Utah statutes.
78B-2-103.   Action barred in another state barred in Utah.

A cause of action which arises in another jurisdiction, and which is not actionable in the other jurisdiction by reason of the lapse of time, may not be pursued in this state, unless the cause of action is held by a citizen of this state who has held the cause of action from the time it accrued.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

